Idaho statutes. Title 45 LIENS, MORTGAGES AND PLEDGES
Chapter 17
NONCONSENSUAL COMMON LAW LIENS

Sec.

45-1701 — 45.1705. [Repealed.]

§ 45-1701. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2016. For prohibition of nonconsensual common law liens, see§ 45-811, Idaho Code.

§ 45-1702. No duty to accept nonconsensual common law liens

Notice of invalid lien. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2016. For prohibition of nonconsensual common law liens, see§ 45-811, Idaho Code.

§ 45-1703. Petition to district court for release of nonconsensual common law lien. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2016. For prohibition of nonconsensual common law liens, see§ 45-811, Idaho Code.

§ 45-1704. Liens against public officers and employees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2016. For prohibition of nonconsensual common law liens, see§ 45-811, Idaho Code.

§ 45-1705. Penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2016. For prohibition of nonconsensual common law liens, see§ 45-811, Idaho Code.